Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2136
Inspection; new electrical installation not in compliance with standards; condemnation; when; opportunity to correct.

When an electrical inspector finds that a new electrical installation or part of a new electrical installation that is not energized is not in compliance with accepted standards of construction, based upon minimum standards adopted by the board pursuant to section 81-2104, he or she shall, if the installation or noncomplying part is such as to seriously and proximately endanger human health and property if energized, order with the approval of his or her superior immediate condemnation of the installation or noncomplying part. When the person responsible for making the installation so condemned is notified, he or she shall promptly proceed to make the corrections cited in the condemnation order.

Laws 1975, LB 525, § 36;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 81-5,106;

Laws 1993, LB 193, § 28.